Illinois, session 104th, SB2520.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Act 5is amended by adding Section 31 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 708/31 new)7    Sec. 31. Budget implementation report. By January 1, 2026, 8and by January 1 of each year thereafter, the Governor's 9Office of Management and Budget shall compile a budget 10implementation report. The budget implementation report shall 11include the following information concerning each grant 12agreement entered into by a State grant-making agency during 13the previous calendar year:14        (1) the total cost of each project; 15        (2) detailed line items specified under guidelines 16    issued by the Governor's Office of Management and Budget; 17    and 18        (3) a description of the specified purpose for the 19    project. 20    The report shall be submitted to the General Assembly and 21shall be posted on the website of the Governor's Office of 22Management and Budget.    SB2520- 2 -LRB104 12308 HLH 22450 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.